Alabama, session 2026rs, HB476.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) This section shall be known and may be
cited as the Alabama Good Samaritan Wildlife Rehabilitation
Act.
(b) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, an
individual may in good faith provide care or treatment to
sustain life or reduce disability to any injured, orphaned, or
debilitated wild bird or animal that is not federally
Page 1

debilitated wild bird or animal that is not federally
HB476 INTRODUCED
protected or otherwise endangered so that the bird or animal
may be returned to the wild subject to all of the following:
(1) The length of care or treatment of a wild bird or
animal may not exceed six months, except the length of care
for beavers may not exceed three years.
(2) A wild bird or animal shall be returned upon
release to the general area from where it was collected.
(3) A raccoon, skunk, bat, fox, coyote, or bobcat shall
be vaccinated for rabies before being released if a veterinary
facility that treats such animals is within five miles of
where the animal is housed.
(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to do
any of the following:
(1) Authorize an individual engaged in wildlife
rehabilitation to engage in the practice of veterinary
medicine as defined in Section 34-29-61, Code of Alabama 1975.
(2) Exempt an individual from the crime of cruelty to
animals as provided in Section 13A-11-14, Code of Alabama
1975.
(3) Authorize an individual to keep or consider a wild
bird or animal as a pet.
(d) A municipality may adopt ordinances further
providing for the care or treatment of wild birds and animals
not inconsistent with this section or state or federal law.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2